Florida, session 2026, SB892.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âParagraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (1), 19 subsection (2), and paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection 20 (3) of section 775.084, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 21 775.084âViolent career criminals; habitual felony offenders 22 and habitual violent felony offenders; three-time violent felony 23 offenders; definitions; procedure; enhanced penalties or 24 mandatory minimum prison terms.â 25 (1)âAs used in this act: 26 (a)ââHabitual felony offenderâ means a defendant for whom 27 the court may impose an extended term of imprisonment, as 28 provided in paragraph (4)(a), if it finds that: 29 1.âThe defendant has previously been convicted of any 30 combination of two or more felonies in this state or other 31 qualified offenses. 32 2.âThe felony for which the defendant is to be sentenced 33 was committed: 34 a.âWhile the defendant was serving a prison sentence or 35 other sentence, or court-ordered or lawfully imposed supervision 36 that is imposed as a result of a prior conviction for a felony 37 or other qualified offense; or 38 b.âWithin 5 years of the date of the conviction of the 39 defendantâs last prior felony or other qualified offense, or 40 within 5 years of the defendantâs release from a prison 41 sentence, probation, community control, control release, 42 conditional release, parole or court-ordered or lawfully imposed 43 supervision or other sentence that is imposed as a result of a 44 prior conviction for a felony or other qualified offense, 45 whichever is later. 46 3.âThe felony for which the defendant is to be sentenced, 47 and one of the two prior felony convictions, is not a violation 48 of s. 893.13 relating to the purchase or the possession of a 49 controlled substance. 50 4.âThe defendant has not received a pardon for any felony 51 or other qualified offense that is necessary for the operation 52 of this paragraph. 53 5.âA conviction of a felony or other qualified offense 54 necessary to the operation of this paragraph has not been set 55 aside in any postconviction proceeding. 56 (b)ââHabitual violent felony offenderâ means a defendant 57 for whom the court may impose an extended term of imprisonment, 58 as provided in paragraph (4)(b), if it finds that: 59 1.âThe defendant has previously been convicted of a felony 60 or an attempt or conspiracy to commit a felony and one or more 61 of such convictions was for: 62 a.âArson; 63 b.âSexual battery; 64 c.âRobbery; 65 d.âKidnapping; 66 e.âAggravated child abuse; 67 f.âAggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult; 68 g.âAggravated assault with a deadly weapon; 69 h.âMurder; 70 i.âManslaughter; 71 j.âAggravated manslaughter of an elderly person or disabled 72 adult; 73 k.âAggravated manslaughter of a child; 74 l.âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 75 destructive device or bomb; 76 m.âArmed burglary; 77 n.âAggravated battery; or 78 o.âAggravated stalking. 79 2.âThe felony for which the defendant is to be sentenced 80 was committed: 81 a.âWhile the defendant was serving a prison sentence or 82 other sentence, or court-ordered or lawfully imposed supervision 83 that is imposed as a result of a prior conviction for an 84 enumerated felony; or 85 b.âWithin 5 years of the date of the conviction of the last 86 prior enumerated felony, or within 5 years of the defendantâs 87 release from a prison sentence, probation, community control, 88 control release, conditional release, parole, or court-ordered 89 or lawfully imposed supervision or other sentence that is 90 imposed as a result of a prior conviction for an enumerated 91 felony, whichever is later. 92 3.âThe defendant has not received a pardon on the ground of 93 innocence for any crime that is necessary for the operation of 94 this paragraph. 95 4.âA conviction of a crime necessary to the operation of 96 this paragraph has not been set aside in any postconviction 97 proceeding. 98 (c)ââThree-time violent felony offenderâ means a defendant 99 for whom the court must impose a mandatory minimum term of 100 imprisonment, as provided in paragraph (4)(c), if it finds that: 101 1.âThe defendant has previously been convicted as an adult 102 two or more times of a felony, or an attempt to commit a felony, 103 and two or more of such convictions were for committing, or 104 attempting to commit, any of the following offenses or 105 combination thereof: 106 a.âArson; 107 b.âSexual battery; 108 c.âRobbery; 109 d.âKidnapping; 110 e.âAggravated child abuse; 111 f.âAggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult; 112 g.âAggravated assault with a deadly weapon; 113 h.âMurder; 114 i.âManslaughter; 115 j.âAggravated manslaughter of an elderly person or disabled 116 adult; 117 k.âAggravated manslaughter of a child; 118 l.âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 119 destructive device or bomb; 120 m.âArmed burglary; 121 n.âAggravated battery; 122 o.âAggravated stalking; 123 p.âHome invasion/robbery; 124 q.âCarjacking; or 125 r.âAn offense which is in violation of a law of any other 126 jurisdiction if the elements of the offense are substantially 127 similar to the elements of any felony offense enumerated in sub 128 subparagraphs a.-q., or an attempt to commit any such felony 129 offense. 130 2.âThe felony for which the defendant is to be sentenced is 131 one of the felonies enumerated in sub-subparagraphs 1.a.-q. and 132 was committed: 133 a.âWhile the defendant was serving a prison sentence or 134 other sentence imposed as a result of a prior conviction for any 135 offense enumerated in sub-subparagraphs 1.a.-r.; or 136 b.âWithin 5 years after the date of the conviction of the 137 last prior offense enumerated in sub-subparagraphs 1.a.-r., or 138 within 5 years after the defendantâs release from a prison 139 sentence, probation, community control, or other sentence 140 imposed as a result of a prior conviction for any offense 141 enumerated in sub-subparagraphs 1.a.-r., whichever is later. 142 3.âThe defendant has not received a pardon on the ground of 143 innocence for any crime that is necessary for the operation of 144 this paragraph. 145 4.âA conviction of a crime necessary to the operation of 146 this paragraph has not been set aside in any postconviction 147 proceeding. 148 (d)ââViolent career criminalâ means a defendant for whom 149 the court must impose imprisonment pursuant to paragraph (4)(d), 150 if it finds that: 151 1.âThe defendant has previously been convicted as an adult 152 three or more times for an offense in this state or other 153 qualified offense that is: 154 a.âAny forcible felony, as described in s. 776.08; 155 b.âAggravated stalking, as described in s. 784.048(3) and 156 (4); 157 c.âAggravated child abuse, as described in s. 827.03(2)(a); 158 d.âAggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult, 159 as described in s. 825.102(2); 160 e.âLewd or lascivious battery, lewd or lascivious 161 molestation, lewd or lascivious conduct, or lewd or lascivious 162 exhibition, as described in s. 800.04 or s. 847.0135(5); 163 f.âEscape, as described in s. 944.40; or 164 g.âA felony violation of chapter 790 involving the use or 165 possession of a firearm. 166 2.âThe defendant has been incarcerated in a state prison or 167 a federal prison. 168 3.âThe primary felony offense for which the defendant is to 169 be sentenced is a felony enumerated in subparagraph 1. and was 170 committed on or after October 1, 1995, and: 171 a.âWhile the defendant was serving a prison sentence or 172 other sentence, or court-ordered or lawfully imposed supervision 173 that is imposed as a result of a prior conviction for an 174 enumerated felony; or 175 b.âWithin 5 years after the conviction of the last prior 176 enumerated felony, or within 5 years after the defendantâs 177 release from a prison sentence, probation, community control, 178 control release, conditional release, parole, or court-ordered 179 or lawfully imposed supervision or other sentence that is 180 imposed as a result of a prior conviction for an enumerated 181 felony, whichever is later. 182 4.âThe defendant has not received a pardon for any felony 183 or other qualified offense that is necessary for the operation 184 of this paragraph. 185 5.âA conviction of a felony or other qualified offense 186 necessary to the operation of this paragraph has not been set 187 aside in any postconviction proceeding. 188 (2)âFor the purposes of this section, the placing of a 189 person on probation or community control without an adjudication 190 of guilt shall be treated as a prior conviction. A conviction 191 for which the defendant has been pardoned or which has been 192 reversed on appeal or set aside in a postconviction proceeding 193 is not a conviction for purposes of this section. 194 (3)(a)âIn a separate proceeding, the court shall determine 195 whether if the defendant is a habitual felony offender or a 196 habitual violent felony offender. The procedure shall be as 197 follows: 198 1.âThe court shall obtain and consider a presentence 199 investigation before prior to the imposition of a sentence as a 200 habitual felony offender or a habitual violent felony offender. 201 2.âWritten notice must shall be served on the defendant or 202 and the defendantâs attorney before the commencement of trial or 203 entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere a sufficient time 204 prior to the entry of a plea or prior to the imposition of 205 sentence in order to allow the preparation of a submission on 206 behalf of the defendant. 207 3.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 1., all evidence 208 presented must shall be presented in open court with full rights 209 of confrontation, cross-examination, and representation by 210 counsel. 211 4.âEach of the findings required as the basis for such 212 sentence shall be found to exist by a preponderance of the 213 evidence and shall be appealable to the extent normally 214 applicable to similar findings. 215 5.âFor the purpose of identification of a habitual felony 216 offender or a habitual violent felony offender, the court shall 217 fingerprint the defendant pursuant to s. 921.241. 218 5.6.âFor an offense committed on or after October 1, 1995, 219 if the state attorney pursues a habitual felony offender 220 sanction or a habitual violent felony offender sanction against 221 the defendant and the court, in a separate proceeding pursuant 222 to this paragraph, determines that the defendant meets the 223 criteria under subsection (1) for imposing such sanction, the 224 court must sentence the defendant as a habitual felony offender 225 or a habitual violent felony offender, subject to imprisonment 226 pursuant to this section unless the court finds that such 227 sentence is not necessary for the protection of the public. If 228 the court finds that it is not necessary for the protection of 229 the public to sentence the defendant as a habitual felony 230 offender or a habitual violent felony offender, the court must 231 shall provide written reasons; a written transcript of orally 232 stated reasons is permissible, if filed by the court within 7 233 days after the date of sentencing. Each month, the court shall 234 submit to the Office of Economic and Demographic Research of the 235 Legislature the written reasons or transcripts in each case in 236 which the court determines not to sentence a defendant as a 237 habitual felony offender or a habitual violent felony offender 238 as provided in this subparagraph. 239 (b)âIn a separate proceeding, the court shall determine 240 whether if the defendant is a three-time violent felony 241 offender. The procedure shall be as follows: 242 1.âThe court shall obtain and consider a presentence 243 investigation before prior to the imposition of a sentence as a 244 three-time violent felony offender. 245 2.âWritten notice must shall be served on the defendant or 246 and the defendantâs attorney before the commencement of trial or 247 entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere a sufficient time 248 prior to the entry of a plea or prior to the imposition of 249 sentence in order to allow the preparation of a submission on 250 behalf of the defendant. 251 3.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 1., all evidence 252 presented must shall be presented in open court with full rights 253 of confrontation, cross-examination, and representation by 254 counsel. 255 4.âEach of the findings required as the basis for such 256 sentence shall be found to exist by a preponderance of the 257 evidence and shall be appealable to the extent normally 258 applicable to similar findings. 259 5.âFor the purpose of identification of a three-time 260 violent felony offender, the court shall fingerprint the 261 defendant pursuant to s. 921.241. 262 5.6.âFor an offense committed on or after the effective 263 date of this act, if the state attorney pursues a three-time 264 violent felony offender sanction against the defendant and the 265 court, in a separate proceeding pursuant to this paragraph, 266 determines that the defendant meets the criteria under 267 subsection (1) for imposing such sanction, the court must 268 sentence the defendant as a three-time violent felony offender, 269 subject to imprisonment pursuant to this section as provided in 270 paragraph (4)(c). 271 (c)âIn a separate proceeding, the court shall determine 272 whether the defendant is a violent career criminal with respect 273 to a primary offense committed on or after October 1, 1995. The 274 procedure shall be as follows: 275 1.âWritten notice must shall be served on the defendant or 276 and the defendantâs attorney before the commencement of trial or 277 entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere a sufficient time 278 prior to the entry of a plea or prior to the imposition of 279 sentence in order to allow the preparation of a submission on 280 behalf of the defendant. 281 2.âAll evidence presented must shall be presented in open 282 court with full rights of confrontation, cross-examination, and 283 representation by counsel. 284 3.âEach of the findings required as the basis for such 285 sentence shall be found to exist by a preponderance of the 286 evidence and shall be appealable only as provided in paragraph 287 (d). 288 4.âFor the purpose of identification, the court shall 289 fingerprint the defendant pursuant to s. 921.241. 290 4.5.âFor an offense committed on or after October 1, 1995, 291 if the state attorney pursues a violent career criminal sanction 292 against the defendant and the court, in a separate proceeding 293 pursuant to this paragraph, determines that the defendant meets 294 the criteria under subsection (1) for imposing such sanction, 295 the court must sentence the defendant as a violent career 296 criminal, subject to imprisonment pursuant to this section 297 unless the court finds that such sentence is not necessary for 298 the protection of the public. If the court finds that it is not 299 necessary for the protection of the public to sentence the 300 defendant as a violent career criminal, the court must shall 301 provide written reasons; a written transcript of orally stated 302 reasons is permissible, if filed by the court within 7 days 303 after the date of sentencing. Each month, the court shall submit 304 to the Office of Economic and Demographic Research of the 305 Legislature the written reasons or transcripts in each case in 306 which the court determines not to sentence a defendant as a 307 violent career criminal as provided in this subparagraph. 308 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.